Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-113
Presiding officer; duties.

It shall be the duty of the presiding officer of the Legislature to preside over the Legislature, to keep and maintain order during the session thereof, and to do and perform the duties devolving on him by general parliamentary usage, and the rules adopted by the Legislature.

Laws 1867, § 4, p. 85;

R.S.1913, § 3755;

C.S.1922, § 3148;

C.S.1929, § 50-114;

Laws 1941, c. 101, § 1, p. 418;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 50-114;

R.S.1943, § 50-113.